Hawaii, session 2025, SB1415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing program combines the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development Housing Choice Voucher rental assistance for homeless veterans administered by public housing authorities with case management and clinical services provided through the Department of Veterans Affairs. The purpose of this bill is to repeal the tenant selection preferences for disabled veterans and the spouses of deceased veterans in the State low-income public housing program to make State law consistent with federal public housing requirements. SECTION 2.  Section 356D-42, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The authority shall select tenants upon the basis of those in greatest need for the particular housing, subject to the following limitations and preferences: (1)  The authority may limit the tenants of any state low-income housing project to classes of persons when required by federal law or regulation as a term or condition of obtaining assistance from the federal government; [(2)  Within the priorities established by the authority recognizing need, veterans with a permanent disability of ten per cent or more, as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and their dependent parents, if any.  The deceased veteranꞌs spouse shall be given first preference.  Parents of veterans shall not use the veteran status of their adult child as a basis for preference;] and [(3)] (2)  Subject to any limitations set by federal law or regulation, the authority shall not select as a tenant, and may terminate the tenancy of, any person if the person or any household member owns or acquires a home within the State." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST